Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-129 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Insulin Access and Affordability
Program at the State Department of Health. The Program is created
for the purpose of increasing marketplace competition, lowering
insulin prices, and addressing shortages in the market for generic
prescription drugs; to reduce the cost of prescription drugs for
HB1380 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

publ ic and private purchasers, taxpayers, consumers, and to increase
patient access to affordable drugs in Oklahoma.
B. To implement the Insulin Access and Affordability Program,
the State Department of Health may:
1. Enter into agreements with one or more nonprofit
pharmaceutical companies registered with the United States Food and
Drug Administration, to accelerate the development, affordability,
and access by Oklahomans of fast-acting insulin; and
2. Enter into memoranda of understanding or contractual
agreements with one or more nonprofit organizations:
a. containing performance objectives related to the
availability of fast-acting biosimilar insulin at
prices not exceeding Thirty Dollars ($30.00) per vial
and Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00) per pack of five pre-
filled insulin pens,
b. identifying the estimated savings to residents of
Oklahoma from the purchase of low-cost insulin,
including, but not limited to, the potential savings
to residents of Oklahoma and self-insureds from the
availability of affordable insulin, and
c. stating the amount or percentage of matching funds
provided by such nonprofit organization, in relation
to state appropriated funds.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
HB1380 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
02/26/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.


















HB1380 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.